Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1390.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of health services; hospital preparedness; mass casualty incident coordination The sum of $700,000 is appropriated from the health services lottery monies fund established by section 36-108.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services to distribute to a nonprofit organization in this state that has received federal hospital preparedness program monies in fiscal year 2024-2025 through the department of health services and that focuses specifically on maintaining statewide mass casualty incident preparedness for health care with all sectors of the community.